Vermont, session 2025-2026, H55.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4088m is amended to read:
§ 4088m. COVERAGE FOR GENDER-AFFIRMING HEALTH CARE
SERVICES
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Gender-affirming health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
(2) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9402.
(3) “Health insurance plan” means Medicaid and any other public health
care assistance program, any individual or group health insurance policy, any
hospital or medical service corporation or health maintenance organization
subscriber contract, or any other health benefit plan offered, issued, or renewed
for any person in this State by a health insurer as defined by 18 V.S.A. § 9402.
For purposes of this section, health insurance plan includes any health benefit
plan offered or administered by the State or any subdivision or instrumentality
of the State. The term does not include benefit plans providing coverage for a
specific disease or other limited benefit coverage, except that it includes any
accident and sickness health plan.
(b) Coverage.
VT LEG #379409 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.55
2025 Page 3 of 9
(1)(A) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for gender-
affirming health care services that:
(A) are medically necessary and clinically appropriate for the
individual’s diagnosis or health condition; and, as determined by the covered
individual’s treatment health care provider. Medically necessary gender-
affirming health care services shall include, if determined by the treating health
care provider to be clinically appropriate for a covered individual:
(i) facial masculinization and feminization procedures; and
(ii) facial hair removal, such as laser hair removal or electrolysis.
(B) are included in the State’s essential health benefits benchmark
plan A health insurance plan shall not impose barriers to accessing gender-
affirming health care services, such as mandating a specific duration of
hormone therapy or requiring correspondence from more than one health care
provider before authorizing gender-affirming surgery or other gender-affirming
health care services.
(2) Coverage provided pursuant to this section by Medicaid or any other
public health care assistance program shall comply with all federal
requirements imposed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health insurance plan from
providing greater coverage for gender-affirming health care services than is
required under this section.
VT LEG #379409 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.55
2025 Page 4 of 9
(c) Cost sharing. A health insurance plan shall not impose greater
coinsurance, co-payment, deductible, or other cost-sharing requirements for
coverage of gender-affirming health care services than apply to the diagnosis
and treatment of any other physical or mental condition under the plan.
(d) On or before January 15 of each year, the Department of Financial
Regulation shall report to the House Committee on Health Care and the Senate
Committees on Health and Welfare and on Finance on health insurance plans’
compliance with this section, utilization of gender-affirming health care
services during the previous calendar year, and any identified barriers to access
to care.
Sec. 2. 8 V.S.A. § 4099f is added to read:
§ 4099f. FERTILITY-RELATED SERVICES
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Experimental fertility procedure” means a procedure for which the
published medical evidence is not sufficient for the American Society for
Reproductive Medicine, its successor organization, or a comparable
organization to regard the procedure as established medical practice.
(2) “Fertility diagnostic care” means procedures, products, medications,
and services intended to provide information about an individual’s fertility,
including laboratory assessments and imaging studies.
VT LEG #379409 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.55
2025 Page 5 of 9
(3) “Fertility preservation services” means procedures, products,
medications, and services intended to preserve fertility, consistent with
established medical practice and professional guidelines published by the
American Society for Reproductive Medicine, its successor organization, or a
comparable organization, for an individual who has a medical or genetic
condition or who is expected to undergo treatment that may directly or
indirectly cause a risk of impairment of fertility. “Fertility preservation
services” includes the procurement and cryopreservation of gametes, embryos,
and reproductive material and storage from the time of cryopreservation for a
period of five years. Storage may be offered for a longer period of time.
(4) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9402.
(5) “Health insurance plan” means any individual or group health
insurance policy; any hospital or medical service corporation or health
maintenance organization subscriber contract; or any other health benefit plan
offered, issued, or renewed for any person in this State by a health insurer.
The term does not include benefit plans providing coverage for specific
diseases or other limited benefit coverage.
(6) “Health insurer” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A. § 9402.
(b) Required coverage. A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for
the following fertility-related services for all insureds:
VT LEG #379409 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.55
2025 Page 6 of 9
(1) Fertility diagnostic care.
(2) Intrauterine insemination treatment with donor or partner semen.
(3) At least three retrievals of oocytes under anesthesia for in vitro
fertilization (IVF) with donor or partner semen or egg, including appropriate
medications for ovarian stimulation; unlimited embryo transfers; and IVF-
related laboratory procedures, ultrasounds, and hormones. A health insurance
plan may, but shall not be required to, provide coverage for preimplantation
genetic testing as a component of IVF.
(4) Clinically appropriate fertility-related medications as ordered or
prescribed by the insured’s treating health care providers.
(5) Fertility preservation services.
(c) Access to services; limitations on coverage.
(1) A health insurance plan shall not establish any rate, term, or
condition that places a greater financial burden on an insured for access to
fertility-related services than for access to treatment for any other health
condition.
(2) A health insurance plan shall not impose any limitations on coverage
for any fertility services based on an insured’s use of donor sperm or eggs,
donor embryos, or surrogacy.
(3) A health insurance plan is not required to provide coverage for:
(A) any experimental fertility procedure; or
VT LEG #379409 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.55
2025 Page 7 of 9
(B) any nonmedical costs related to donor sperm or eggs, donor
embryos, or surrogacy.
(d) Reporting. On or before January 15 of each year, the Department of
Financial Regulation shall report to the House Committee on Health Care and
the Senate Committees on Health and Welfare and on Finance on health
insurance plans’ compliance with this section, utilization of fertility-related
services during the previous calendar year, and any identified barriers to access
to care.
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 1901n is added to read:
§ 1901n. COVERAGE OF FERTILITY-RELATED SERVICES
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Fertility diagnostic care” and “fertility preservation services” have
the same meanings as in 8 V.S.A. § 4099f.
(2) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9402.
(b) Coverage. The Agency of Human Services shall provide Medicaid
coverage for the following fertility-related services for all Medicaid
beneficiaries:
(1) Fertility diagnostic care.
(2) Intrauterine insemination treatment with donor or partner semen.
VT LEG #379409 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.55
2025 Page 8 of 9
(3) At least three retrievals of oocytes under anesthesia for in vitro
fertilization (IVF) with donor or partner semen or egg, including appropriate
medications for ovarian stimulation; unlimited embryo transfers; and IVF-
related laboratory procedures, ultrasounds, and hormones. The Agency may,
but shall not be required to, provide Medicaid coverage for preimplantation
genetic testing as a component of IVF.
(4) Clinically appropriate fertility-related medications as ordered or
prescribed by the beneficiary’s treating health care providers.
(5) Fertility preservation services.
Sec. 4. COVERAGE FOR FERTILITY-RELATED SERVICES; MEDICAID
STATE PLAN AMENDMENT
On or before September 1, 2025, the Agency of Human Services shall
request approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
amend Vermont’s Medicaid state plan to include coverage for fertility-related
services as set forth in Sec. 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Secs. 1 (8 V.S.A. § 4088m) and 2 (8 V.S.A. § 4099f) shall take effect
on January 1, 2026 and shall apply to all health insurance plans issued on and
after January 1, 2026 on such date as a health insurer offers, issues, or renews
the health insurance plan, but in no event later than January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #379409 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.55
2025 Page 9 of 9
(b) Sec. 3 (33 V.S.A. § 1901n) shall take effect upon approval by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of Vermont’s request to provide
coverage of fertility-related services as set forth in that section.
(c) Sec. 4 (coverage for fertility-related services; Medicaid state plan
amendment) and this section shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379409 v.1